Nevada, session 83, AB207.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 687B.404 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
687B.404 1. An insurer or other organization providing
health coverage pursuant to chapter 689A, 689B, 689C, 695A,
695B, 695C, 695F or 695G of NRS, including, without limitation, a
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
health maintenance organization or managed care organization that
provides health care services through managed care to recipients of
Medicaid under the State Plan for Medicaid, shall adhere to the
applicable provisions of the Paul Wellstone and Pete Domenici
Mental Health Parity and Addiction Equity Act of 2008, Public Law
110-343, Division C, Title V, Subtitle B, and any federal regulations
issued pursuant thereto.
2. On or before July 1 of each year, the Commissioner shall
prescribe and provide to each insurer or other organization
providing health coverage subject to the provisions of subsection 1 a
data request that solicits information necessary to evaluate the
compliance of an insurer or other organization with the Paul
Wellstone and Pete Domenici Mental Health Parity and Addiction
Equity Act of 2008, Public Law 110-343, Division C, Title V,
Subtitle B, including, without limitation, the comparative analyses
specified in 42 U.S.C. § [300gg-26(a)(8).] 300gg-26(a).
3. On or before October 1 of each year, each insurer or other
organization providing health coverage subject to the provisions of
subsection 1 shall:
(a) Complete and submit to the Commissioner , in accordance
with the System for Electronic Rate and Form Filing developed
and implemented by the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners, the data request prescribed pursuant to subsection
2; or
(b) Submit to the Commissioner , in accordance with the
System for Electronic Rate and Form Filing developed and
implemented by the National Association of Insurance
Commissioners, a copy of a report submitted by the insurer or other
organization to the Federal Government demonstrating compliance
with the Paul Wellstone and Pete Domenici Mental Health Parity
and Addiction Equity Act of 2008, Public Law 110-343, Division C,
Title V, Subtitle B, including, without limitation, the comparative
analyses specified in 42 U.S.C. § [300gg-26(a)(8).] 300gg-26(a).
The Commissioner may request from an insurer or other
organization who submits a copy of such a report any supplemental
information necessary to determine whether the insurer or other
organization is in compliance with that federal law.
4. Any information provided by an insurer or other
organization to the Commissioner pursuant to subsection 3 is a
public record except that the following information is confidential
[.] :
(a) Personally identifiable information of a consumer.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(b) Any information determined by the Commissioner to
constitute a trade secret. In determining whether information
provided pursuant to subsection 3, including, without limitation,
information concerning mental health parity in the adequacy of
the networks of insurers and other organizations, reimbursement
rates for providers of health care, in-network and out-of-network
utilization rates and the number and percentage of denials of
claims, constitutes a trade secret pursuant to this paragraph:
(1) The Commissioner shall not make a determination that
the information constitutes a trade secret solely because the
information reflects whether an insurer is in compliance with the
provisions of this section; and
(2) Any doubt or uncertainty regarding whether the
information constitutes a trade secret must be resolved in favor of
a determination that the information does not constitute a trade
secret.
5. On or before December 31 of each year, the Commissioner
shall compile a report summarizing the information submitted to the
Commissioner pursuant to this section and submit the report to:
(a) The Patient Protection Commission created by
NRS 439.908;
(b) The Governor; and
(c) The Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau for
transmittal to:
(1) In even-numbered years, the next regular session of the
Legislature; and
(2) In odd-numbered years, the Joint Interim Standing
Committee on Health and Human Services.
6. The Commissioner may adopt any regulations necessary to
carry out the provisions of this section.
7. As used in this section, “trade secret” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 600A.030.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)